Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 36-99.01.
Provisions related to rehabilitation of existing buildings.

The General Assembly hereby declares that (i) there is an urgent need to improve the housing conditions of low and moderate income individuals and families, many of whom live in substandard housing, particularly in the older cities of the Commonwealth; (ii) there are large numbers of older residential buildings in the Commonwealth, both occupied and vacant, which are in urgent need of rehabilitation and which must be rehabilitated if the State’s citizens are to be housed in decent, sound, and sanitary conditions; and (iii) the application of those building code requirements currently in force to housing rehabilitation has sometimes led to the imposition of costly and time-consuming requirements that result in a significant reduction in the amount of rehabilitation activity taking place.

The General Assembly further declares that (i) there is an urgent need to improve the existing condition of many of the Commonwealth’s stock of commercial properties, particularly in older cities; (ii) there are large numbers of older commercial buildings in the Commonwealth, both occupied and vacant, that are in urgent need of rehabilitation and that must be rehabilitated if the citizens of the Commonwealth are to be provided with decent, sound and sanitary work spaces; and (iii) the application of the existing building code to such rehabilitation has sometimes led to the imposition of costly and time-consuming requirements that result in a significant reduction in the amount of rehabilitation activity taking place.

The Board is hereby directed and empowered to make such changes as are necessary to fulfill the intent of the General Assembly as expressed in subsections A and B, including, but not limited to amendments to the Building Code and adequate training of building officials, enforcement personnel, contractors, and design professionals throughout the Commonwealth.

History.

2000, c. 35; 2002, c. 555.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 555 substituted “that” for “which” preceding “result” near the end of subsection A; inserted present subsection B and redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C; and in present subsection C, substituted “subsections A and B” for “subsection A,” deleted “and Code” following “officials,” and inserted “contractors.”

§ 36-99.1.
Repealed by Acts 1994, c. 895, effective July 1, 1995.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-99.1

, which required certification of electrical, plumbing and building related mechanical workers, was derived from Acts 1974, c. 437; 1977, c. 613; 1978, cc. 268, 751; 1979, c. 352; 1982, c. 314.

§ 36-99.2.
Standards for replacement glass.

Any replacement glass installed in buildings constructed prior to the effective date of the Uniform Statewide Building Code shall meet the quality and installation standards for glass installed in new buildings as are in effect at the time of installation.

History.

1976, c. 137.

§ 36-99.3.
Smoke alarms and automatic sprinkler systems in institutions of higher education.

Buildings at institutions of higher education that contain dormitories for sleeping purposes shall be provided with battery operated or AC powered smoke alarm devices installed therein in accordance with the Building Code. All dormitories at public institutions of higher education and private institutions of higher education shall have installed and use due diligence in maintaining in good working order such alarms regardless of when the building was constructed.

The Board of Housing and Community Development shall promulgate regulations pursuant to §

2.2-4011

establishing standards for automatic sprinkler systems throughout all buildings at private institutions of higher education and public institutions of higher education that are (i) more than 75 feet or more than six stories high and (ii) used, in whole or in part, as dormitories to house students. Such buildings shall be equipped with automatic sprinkler systems by September 1, 1999, regardless of when such buildings were constructed.

The chief administrative office of the institution of higher education shall obtain a certificate of compliance with the provisions of this section from the building official of the locality in which the institution of higher education is located or, in the case of state-owned buildings, from the Director of the Department of General Services.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any dormitory at a military public institution of higher education that is patrolled 24 hours a day by military guards.

History.

1982, c. 357; 1997, c. 584; 2018, cc. 41, 81.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, c. 931, cl. 1 provides: “That a private institution located in Hampton Roads shall be required to comply with the provisions of §

36-99.3

for an eight-story residence hall which is twenty-eight years old and has a square footage of 60,843 on January 1, 2000.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the following changes were made to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588: in subsection A, substituted “Buildings at institutions of higher education that contain” for “College or university buildings containing” and “All dormitories at public institutions of higher education and private institutions of higher education” for “All public or private college and university dormitories”; in subsection B, substituted “buildings at private institutions of higher education and public institutions of higher education that” for “public or private college or university buildings which”; in subsection C, twice substituted “institution of higher education” for “college or university”; in subsection D, substituted “military public institution of higher education that” for “state-supported military college or university which”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 1997 amendment

added the subsection A, C and D designations; in subsection A, substituted “All public or private college” for “After January 1, 1984, all college” in the first sentence and inserted “public or private” preceding “college and university” in the second sentence; added subsection B; and inserted “with the provisions of this section” preceding “from the building official” in subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 41 and 81 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “battery operated or AC powered smoke alarm” for “battery or AC powered smoke detector” and deleted “Uniform Statewide” preceding “Building Code” in the first sentence, and substituted “alarms” for “detectors” in the second sentence.

§ 36-99.4.
Smoke alarms in certain juvenile care facilities.

Battery operated or AC powered smoke alarm devices shall be installed in all local and regional detention homes, group homes, and other residential care facilities for children or juveniles that are operated by or under the auspices of the Department of Juvenile Justice, regardless of when the building was constructed, in accordance with the provisions of the Building Code. Administrators of such homes and facilities shall be responsible for the installation and maintenance of the smoke alarm devices.

History.

1984, c. 179; 1989, c. 733; 2018, cc. 41, 81.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 41 and 81 are identical, and substituted “smoke alarm” for “smoke detector” twice; inserted “operated” following “Battery” at the beginning, and substituted “provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code by July 1, 1986” for “provision of the Building Code,” and made stylistic changes. .

§ 36-99.5.
Smoke alarms for persons who are deaf or hard of hearing.

Smoke alarms for persons who are deaf or hard of hearing shall be installed only in conformance with the provisions of the current Building Code and maintained in accordance with the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (§

27-94

et seq.) and subdivision C 6 of §

36-105

, Part III of the Building Code. Such alarms shall be provided by the landlord or proprietor, upon request by a tenant of a rental unit or a person living with such tenant who is deaf or hard of hearing as referenced by the Virginia Fair Housing Law (§

36-96.1

et seq.), or upon request by an occupant of any of the following occupancies, regardless of when constructed:

All dormitory buildings arranged for the shelter and sleeping accommodations of more than 20 individuals;

All boarding and lodging houses arranged for shelter and sleeping accommodations of more than five individuals; or

All residential rental dwelling units.A tenant shall be responsible for the maintenance and operation of the smoke alarm in the tenant’s unit in accordance with §

55.1-1227

.A hotel or motel shall have available no fewer than one such smoke alarm for each 70 units or portion thereof, except that this requirement shall not apply to any hotel or motel with fewer than 35 units. The proprietor of the hotel or motel shall post in a conspicuous place at the registration desk or counter a permanent sign stating the availability of smoke alarms for persons who are deaf or hard of hearing. Visual alarms shall be provided for all meeting rooms for which an advance request has been made.The proprietor or landlord may require a refundable deposit for a smoke alarm, not to exceed the original cost or replacement cost, whichever is greater, of such smoke alarm. Rental fees shall not be increased as compensation for this requirement.A landlord of a rental unit shall provide a reasonable accommodation to a person who is deaf or hard of hearing who requests installation of a smoke alarm that is appropriate for persons who are deaf or hard of hearing if such accommodation is appropriate in accordance with the Virginia Fair Housing Law (§

36-96.1

et seq.).

History.

1984, c. 753; 1988, c. 183; 2011, c. 766; 2018, cc. 41, 81; 2019, c. 288.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1984 act having been

36-99.4

.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1227

” for “§ 55-225.4 or 55-248.16, as applicable.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 766 added “however, any locality with an ordinance shall follow a uniform set of standards for maintenance of smoke detectors established in the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.)” at the end of the last paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 41 and 81 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 288 substituted “hard of hearing” for “hearing impaired” throughout.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-101 Residential Lease Agreement, et seq.; No. 16-126. Simple Month-to-Month Lease. No. 16-221 Accessibility by Handicapped Persons, et seq.; No. 16-301 Application for Tenancy; No. 16-323 Landlord’s Certificate of Inspection of Smoke Alarm.

§ 36-99.5:1.
Smoke alarms and other fire detection and suppression systems in assisted living facilities, adult day care centers and nursing homes and facilities.

Battery operated or AC powered smoke alarm devices shall be installed in all assisted living facilities and adult day care centers licensed by the Department of Social Services, regardless of when the building was constructed. The location and installation of the smoke alarms shall be determined by the Building Code.The licensee shall obtain a certificate of compliance from the building official of the locality in which the facility or center is located, or in the case of state-owned buildings, from the Department of General Services.The licensee shall maintain the smoke alarm devices in good working order.

The Board of Housing and Community Development shall promulgate regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) establishing standards for requiring (i) smoke alarms and (ii) such other fire detection and suppression systems as deemed necessary by the Board to increase the safety of persons in assisted living facilities, residential dwelling units designed or developed and marketed to senior citizens, nursing homes, and nursing facilities. All nursing homes and nursing facilities that are already equipped with sprinkler systems shall comply with regulations relating to smoke alarms.

History.

1988, c. 55; 1990, cc. 448, 703; 1992, c. 356; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 2004, c. 584; 2018, cc. 41, 81.

Cross references.

For provisions pertaining to licensing of assisted living facilities, adult day care centers and child welfare agencies, see Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, cc. 957 and 993, which amended this section, provide in cl. 4: “That the provisions of this act shall be implemented to the extent funds are appropriated therefor.” See Acts 1993, c. 994, item 381 B, which relates to the extent funds have been appropriated for Acts 1993, cc. 957 and 993. Funds were appropriated in the 1999 Budget at Item 403, and in Item 384 A. 1. of the 2000-2002 Budget.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 584, in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation and clause (ii), in the last sentence, deleted “these” preceding “regulations” and added “relating to smoke detectors” at the end and made a related change.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 41 and 81 are identical, and, substituted “smoke alarm” for “smoke detector” throughout; in subsection A, substituted “Battery operated or AC powered” for “Battery- or AC-powered” and deleted “Uniform Statewide” preceding “Building Code”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 36-99.6.
Underground and aboveground storage tank inspections.

The Board of Housing and Community Development shall incorporate, as part of the Building Code, regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Water Control Board governing the installation, repair, upgrade and closure of underground and aboveground storage tanks.

Inspections undertaken pursuant to such Building Code regulations shall be done by employees of the local building department or another individual authorized by the local building department.

History.

1987, c. 528; 1992, c. 456; 1994, c. 256.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-819 Hazardous Materials.

§ 36-99.6:1.
Repealed by Acts 1994, c. 256.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-99.6:1

, concerning standards for aboveground storage tanks, was enacted by Acts 1990, c. 589.

§ 36-99.6:2.
Installation of in-building emergency communication equipment for emergency public safety personnel.

The Board of Housing and Community Development shall promulgate regulations as part of the Building Code requiring such new commercial, industrial, and multifamily buildings as determined by the Board be (i) designed and constructed so that emergency public safety personnel may send and receive emergency communications from within those structures or (ii) equipped with emergency communications equipment so that emergency public safety personnel may send and receive emergency communications from within those structures.

For the purposes of this section:

“Emergency communications equipment”
includes, but is not limited to, two-way radio communications, signal boosters, bi-directional amplifiers, radiating cable systems or internal multiple antenna, or any combination of the foregoing.

“Emergency public safety personnel”
includes firefighters, emergency medical services personnel, law-enforcement officers, and other emergency public safety personnel routinely called upon to provide emergency assistance to members of the public in a wide variety of emergency situations, including, but not limited to, fires, medical emergencies, violent crimes, and terrorist attacks.

History.

2003, c. 611.

§ 36-99.6:3.
Regulation of HVAC facilities.

The Board shall promulgate regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) establishing standards for heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC) facilities in new, privately owned residential dwellings.

History.

2004, c. 132.

§ 36-99.7.
Asbestos inspection in buildings to be renovated or demolished; exceptions.

A local building department shall not issue a building permit allowing a building for which an initial building permit was issued before January 1, 1985, to be renovated or demolished until the local building department receives certification from the owner or his agent that the affected portions of the building have been inspected for the presence of asbestos by an individual licensed to perform such inspections pursuant to §

54.1-503

and that no asbestos-containing materials were found or that appropriate response actions will be undertaken in accordance with the requirements of the Clean Air Act National Emission Standard for the Hazardous Air Pollutant (NESHAPS) (40 CFR 61, Subpart M), and the asbestos worker protection requirements established by the U.S. Occupational Safety and Health Administration for construction workers (29 CFR 1926.1101). Local educational agencies that are subject to the requirements established by the Environmental Protection Agency under the Asbestos Hazard Emergency Response Act (AHERA) shall also certify compliance with 40 CFR 763 and subsequent amendments thereto.

To meet the inspection requirements of subsection A except with respect to schools, asbestos inspection of renovation projects consisting only of repair or replacement of roofing, floorcovering, or siding materials may be satisfied by a statement that the materials to be repaired or replaced are assumed to contain friable asbestos and that asbestos installation, removal, or encapsulation will be accomplished by a licensed asbestos contractor.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to single-family dwellings or residential housing with four or fewer units, unless the renovation or demolition of such buildings is for commercial or public development purposes. The provisions of this section shall not apply if the combined amount of regulated asbestos-containing material involved in the renovation or demolition is less than 260 linear feet on pipes or less than 160 square feet on other facility components or less than thirty-five cubic feet off facility components where the length or area could not be measured previously.

An abatement area shall not be reoccupied until the building official receives certification from the owner that the response actions have been completed and final clearances have been measured. The final clearance levels for reoccupancy of the abatement area shall be 0.01 or fewer asbestos fibers per cubic centimeter if determined by Phase Contrast Microscopy analysis (PCM) or 70 or fewer structures per square millimeter if determined by Transmission Electron Microscopy analysis (TEM).

History.

1987, c. 656; 1988, c. 723; 1989, c. 398; 1990, c. 823; 1993, c. 660; 1996, c. 742; 1997, c. 166.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1987 act having been

36-99.6

.

The 1996 amendment

inserted “for which an initial building permit was issued before January 1, 1985” following “a building permit allowing a building” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 1997 amendment

substituted “(29 CFR 1926.1101)” for “(29 CFR 1926.58)” at the end of the first sentence of subsection A and rewrote subsection B.

Law Review.

For comment, “Recovering Asbestos Abatement Cost,” see 10 G.M.U. L. Rev. 451 (1988).

For article, “What’s Current in Asbestos Regulations,” see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 375 (1989).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-819 Hazardous Materials.

§ 36-99.8.
Skirting.

Manufactured homes installed or relocated pursuant to the Building Code shall have skirting installed within sixty days of occupancy of the home. Skirting materials shall be durable, suitable for exterior exposures, and installed in accordance with the manufacturer’s installation instructions. Skirting shall be secured as necessary to ensure stability, to minimize vibrations, to minimize susceptibility to wind damage, and to compensate for possible frost heave.
Each manufactured home shall have a minimum of one opening in the skirting providing access to any water supply or sewer drain connections under the home.
Such openings shall be a minimum of eighteen inches in any dimension and not less than three square feet in area. The access panel or door shall not be fastened in a manner requiring the use of a special tool to open or remove the panel or door.
On-site fabrication of the skirting by the owner or installer of the home shall be acceptable, provided that the material meets the requirements of the Building Code.

As used in this section, “skirting” means a weather-resistant material used to enclose the space from the bottom of the manufactured home to grade.

History.

1990, c. 593.

§ 36-99.9.
Standards for fire suppression systems in certain facilities.

The Board of Housing and Community Development shall promulgate regulations by October 1, 1990, in accordance with the Administrative Process Act, Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2, establishing standards for fire suppression systems in nursing facilities and nursing homes, regardless of when such facilities or institutions were constructed. In the development of these standards, the Board shall seek input from relevant state agencies.

Units consisting of certified long-term care beds described in this section and §

32.1-126.2

located on the ground floor of general hospitals shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.

History.

1990, c. 804.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1990 act having been

36-99.8

.

§ 36-99.9:1.
Standards for fire suppression systems in hospitals.

The Board of Housing and Community Development shall promulgate regulations, to be effective by October 1, 1995, in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), establishing standards for automatic sprinkler systems in hospitals, regardless of when such facilities were constructed. In the development of these standards, the Board shall seek input from relevant state and local agencies as well as affected institutions.

For the purposes of this section and §

32.1-126.3

, “automatic sprinkler system” means a device for suppressing fire in patient rooms and other areas of the hospital customarily used for patient care.

History.

1995, c. 631.

§ 36-99.10.
Repealed by Acts 1994, c. 187.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-99.10

, concerning standards for water saving conservation, was enacted by Acts 1992, c. 515.

§ 36-99.10:1.
Standards for installation of acoustical treatment measures in certain buildings and structures.

The Board of Housing and Community Development shall promulgate regulations by October 1, 1994, for installation of acoustical treatment measures for construction in areas affected by above average noise levels from aircraft due to their proximity to flight operations at nearby airports. Such regulations shall provide for implementation at the option of a local governing body pursuant to the provisions of §

15.2-2295

.

History.

1994, c. 745; 2002, c. 180.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 180 substituted “15.2-2295” for “15.1-491.03.”

§ 36-99.11.
Identification of disabled parking spaces by above grade signage.

All parking spaces reserved for the use of persons with disabilities shall be identified by above grade signs, regardless of whether identification of such spaces by above grade signs was required when any particular space was reserved for the use of persons with disabilities. A sign or symbol painted or otherwise displayed on the pavement of a parking space shall not constitute an above grade sign. Any parking space not identified by an above grade sign shall not be a parking space reserved for the disabled within the meaning of this section.

All above grade disabled parking space signs shall have the bottom edge of the sign no lower than four feet nor higher than seven feet above the parking surface. Such signs shall be designed and constructed in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code.

Building owners shall install above grade signs identifying all parking spaces reserved for the use of persons with disabilities in accordance with this section and the applicable provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code by January 1, 1993.

Effective July 1, 1998, all disabled parking signs shall include the following language: PENALTY, $100-500 Fine, TOW-AWAY ZONE. Such language may be placed on a separate sign and attached below existing above grade disabled parking signs, provided that the bottom edge of the attached sign is no lower than four feet above the parking surface.

History.

1992, cc. 753, 764; 1997, cc. 783, 904.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1992 act having been

36-99.10

.

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendments by cc. 783 and 904 are identical, and substituted “persons with disabilities” for “handicapped persons” throughout the section and added subsection D.

§ 36-100.
Notice and hearings on adoption of Code, amendments and repeals.

The adoption, amendment, or repeal of any Code provisions shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act, Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2, pursuant to subdivision A 12 of §

2.2-4006

. Before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any Code provisions, the Board shall hold at least one public hearing. In addition to the notice requirement contained therein, the Board shall notify in writing the building official or, where none, the local governing body of every city or county in the Commonwealth. At any such hearing all persons desiring to do so shall be afforded an opportunity to present their views.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1977, c. 613; 1991, c. 49; 2006, c. 719; 2010, c. 65.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 719, in the first sentence, substituted “The adoption, amendment, or repeal of” for “The Board shall adopt, amend, or repeal” and “shall be exempt from” for “in accordance with” and added “pursuant to subdivision A 13 of §

2.2-4006

” at the end, and substituted “the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any Code provisions” for “any such action” in the second sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 65 substituted “subdivision A 12” for “subdivision A 13” in the first sentence.

§ 36-101.
Effective date of Code; when local codes may remain in effect.

No Code provisions shall be made effective prior to January 1, 1973, or later than September 1, 1973; provided that the initial Building Code shall not become effective earlier than 180 days after the publication thereof.

It is further provided that where, in the opinion of the Review Board, local codes are in substantial conformity with the State Code the local code may, with the concurrence of the Review Board remain in effect for two years from the effective day of the State Code for transition to implementation of the State Code.

History.

1972, c. 829.

§ 36-102.
Modification, amendment or repeal of Code provisions.

The Board may modify, amend or repeal any Code provisions from time to time as the public interest requires, after notice and hearing as provided in §

36-100

of this chapter. No such modification or amendment shall be made effective earlier than thirty days from the adoption thereof.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1977, c. 613.

§ 36-103.
Buildings, etc., existing or projected before effective date of Code.

Any building or structure, for which a building permit has been issued or on which construction has commenced, or for which working drawings have been prepared in the year prior to the effective date of the Building Code, shall remain subject to the building regulations in effect at the time of such issuance or commencement of construction. However, the Board may adopt and promulgate as part of the Building Code, building regulations that facilitate the maintenance, rehabilitation, development and reuse of existing buildings at the least possible cost to ensure the protection of the public health, safety and welfare. Subsequent reconstruction, renovation, repair or demolition of such buildings or structures shall be subject to the pertinent construction and rehabilitation provisions of the Building Code. The provisions of this section shall be applicable to equipment. However, building owners may elect to install partial or full fire alarms or other safety equipment that was not required by the Building Code in effect at the time a building was constructed without meeting current Building Code requirements, provided the installation does not create a hazardous condition. Permits for installation shall be obtained in accordance with the Uniform Statewide Building Code.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1976, c. 638; 1982, c. 267; 1986, c. 32; 2002, c. 555; 2003, c. 650.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 555, in the second sentence, deleted “minimum” preceding “building,” and substituted “that facilitate the maintenance, rehabilitation, development and reuse of existing buildings at the least possible cost to ensure the protection of the public health, safety and welfare” for “for existing buildings to ensure the protection of public health, safety and welfare” at the end; and inserted “maintenance and rehabilitation” in the third sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 650 substituted “construction” for “maintenance” in the third sentence.

§ 36-104.
Code to be printed and furnished on request; true copy.

The Department shall have printed from time to time and keep available in pamphlet form all Code provisions. Such pamphlets shall be furnished upon request to members of the public. A true copy of all such provisions adopted and in force shall be kept in the office of the Department, accessible to the public. The Department may charge a reasonable fee for distribution of the Building Code based on production and distribution costs.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1974, c. 298; 1977, c. 613.